North Carolina, session 2025, SB585.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115D-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-5. Administration of institutions by State Board of Community Colleges;
personnel exempt from North Carolina Human Resources Act; extension
courses; tuition waiver; in-plant training; contracting, etc., for establishment
and operation of extension units of the community college system; use of existing
public school facilities.
…
(b) In order to make instruction as accessible as possible to all citizens, the teaching of
curricular courses and of noncurricular extension courses at convenient locations away from
institution campuses as well as on campuses is authorized and shall be encouraged. A pro rata
portion of the established regular tuition rate charged a full-time student shall be charged a
part-time student taking any curriculum course. In lieu of any tuition charge, the State Board of
Community Colleges shall establish a uniform registration fee, or a schedule of uniform
registration fees, to be charged students enrolling in extension courses for which instruction is
financed primarily from State funds. The State Board of Community Colleges may provide by
general and uniform regulations for waiver of tuition and registration fees for the following:
…
(2) Courses requested by the following entities that support the organizations'
training needs and are on a specialized course list approved by the State Board
of Community Colleges:
…
d. Municipal, county, or State EMS or rescue and lifesaving departments.
This sub-subdivision includes municipal and county departments
whose primary responsibility is to (i) embed mental health clinicians
in 911 call centers to assist in directing and providing appropriate
resources to calls for service and (ii) pair mental health clinicians, peer
support specialists, and other trained professionals with first
responders to respond to calls for service.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S585-v-1*